Tennessee, session 114, SB1043.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding a law to the contrary, the swimming pool that is scheduled
to be constructed at Henry Horton State Park, and for which the State Building Commission
approved the selection of a designer on August 10, 2023, is hereby designated the "Riley
Gaines Aquatic Center".
SECTION 2. The department of environment and conservation is directed to erect
suitable signs or affix suitable markers designating such swimming pool as the "Riley Gaines
Aquatic Center".
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1043
002054
- 1 -